Arkansas, session 2025, SB430.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 16, Chapter 90, Subchapter 3, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
16-90-312. Restitution for victims of human trafficking.
(a) A person convicted of any violation of the Human Trafficking Act
of 2013, § 5-18-101 et seq., shall be ordered to pay mandatory restitution to
the victim or other entity, as appropriate, including without limitation:
(1) Costs of medical and psychological treatment, including
physical and occupational therapy and rehabilitation;
(2) Costs of necessary transportation, temporary housing, and
child care;
(3) Cost of the investigation and prosecution and other court-
related costs such as victim advocate fees;
(4) Return of property, cost of damage to property, or full
value of property if destroyed or damaged beyond repair;
*CEB070*
03/11/2025 1:11:55 PM CEB070

SB430
(5)(A) Expenses incurred by a victim and any household member or
other family member of the victim in relocating away from the defendant or
his or her associates, including without limitation:
(i) Deposits for utilities and telephone service;
(ii) Deposits for rental housing;
(iii) Temporary lodging and food expenses; and
(iv) Clothing and personal items.
(B) Expenses incurred under subdivision (a)(5)(A) of this
section shall be verified as necessary for:
(i) The personal safety of the victim or household
member or other family member of the victim; or
(ii) The emotional well-being of the victim; and
(6) Any other loss suffered by the victim as a result of any
violation of the Human Trafficking Act of 2013, § 5-18-101 et seq.
(b) The return of the victim to his or her home country or other
absence of the victim from the state shall not prevent the victim from
receiving restitution under this section.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 16-90-712(a)(1), concerning conditions for
claims filed under the Arkansas Crime Victims Reparations Act, is amended to
read as follows:
(1) Unless the claim has been filed with the Crime Victims
Reparations Board within one (1) year five (5) years after the injury or
death upon which the claim is based, unless except:
(A) When the board finds good cause for the failure to
file a timely claim; or
(B) If the victim is a minor, the claim is filed within
five (5) years after the date the victim reaches eighteen (18) years of age;








03/11/2025 1:11:55 PM CEB070